Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 16 Cooperative Marketing Associations
43-16-146. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-16-146 (Acts 1923, ch. 100, § 31; Shan. Supp., § 2534a73; Code 1932, § 3829; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1847), concerning fees for filing articles and amendments to articles of incorporation, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 243, § 4.

43-16-147. Combinations of existing corporations into associations — Amendment of charters.

Corporations not for profit, of this class, previously organized under the general incorporation laws or laws later enacted, are empowered to combine into associations upon such terms as may be provided and agreed upon, or by one corporation becoming a member of the other. Further, preexisting charters of the corporations are amended, under the power reserved to the general assembly, so as to bring same into conformity with this law, thus granting them the powers and imposing upon them the duties and liabilities set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1917, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., § 2534a74; mod. Code 1932, § 3830; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1848.

Cross-References. Nonprofit corporations generally, title 48, chs. 51-68.

43-16-148. Corporations organized as subsidiaries of agricultural cooperative associations exempt from privilege taxes.

All corporations organized as subsidiaries and controlled by any agricultural cooperative association formed in accordance with the laws of this state shall not be considered corporations organized for profit and doing business in Tennessee, or subject to any privilege tax levied by any law as a tax for the privilege of doing business for profit in Tennessee, it being the legislative intent to exempt by this section all such subsidiary corporations controlled by agricultural cooperative associations, where any and all profits earned by such subsidiary corporations are paid over to or expended for the benefit of the agricultural cooperative associations, with the result that the activities carried on by the corporations eventually promote and benefit the agricultural interests of this state.

Acts 1939, ch. 168, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3830.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1849.

Cross-References. Exemption from privilege tax, § 67-4-102.